Hawaii statutes.
§161-28 Bribery. (a) Any person or
employee of any person, who gives, pays, or offers, directly or indirectly, to
any inspector, or to any other officer or employee of the State authorized to
perform any of the duties prescribed by this chapter or by the rules adopted by
the board, any money or other thing of value, with intent to influence the
inspector or other officer or employee of this State in the discharge of any
duty shall be guilty of a class C felony. The minimum fine shall be $5,000.

(b) Any inspector or other officer or employee
of this State authorized to perform any of the duties prescribed by this
chapter who accepts any money, gift, or other thing of value from any person,
officer, agent, or employee of any person, given with intent to influence the
state inspector's, officer's, or employee's official actions, shall be
discharged from office and shall be guilty of a class C felony. The minimum
fine shall be $1,000.

(c) Notwithstanding subsection (a), any
inspector or other officer or employee of this State authorized to perform any
of the duties prescribed by this chapter who receives or accepts from any
person who is engaged in intrastate commerce and is subject to this chapter any
gift, money, or other thing of value given with or without intent to influence
the inspector's, officer's, or employee's official actions, shall be discharged
from office and shall be guilty of a class C felony. The minimum fine shall be
$1,000. [L 1969, c 212, §20; gen ch 1985; am L 1993, c 92, §5]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next